South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S276.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Sections 63-11-400 through 63-11-420 of the S.C. Code are amended to read: Section 63-11-400. This article may be cited as the "South Carolina Children's Advocacy Medical Response System Act". Child Abuse and Neglect Network." Section 63-11-410. There is created the South Carolina Children's Advocacy Medical Response System,  Child Abuse and Neglect Network, a program to provide coordination and administration of medical service resources to those entities responding to cases of suspected child abuse or neglect. The program is administered by the University of South Carolina School of Medicine. Section 63-11-420. For purposes of this article: (1) "Child" has the same meaning as provided for in Section 63-7-20. (2) "Child abuse or neglect" has the same meaning as provided for in Section 63-7-20. (3) "Children's advocacy centers" has the same meaning as provided for in Section 63-11-310. (4) "Program" means the South Carolina Children's Advocacy Medical Response System, Child Abuse and Neglect Network, created pursuant to this article. (5) "Health care Healthcare provider" means a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant licensed to practice in this State pursuant to Article 1, Chapter 47, Title 40, Article 1, Chapter 33, Title 40, and Article 7, Chapter 47, Title 40, respectively. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----